Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6056YC (2) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 910.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Notwithstanding any other statute 3 or rule of law, with the consent of the defendant and the 4 prosecuting attorney, the court may order as part of the 5 dismissal of a public offense that the defendant pay pecuniary 6 damages to the victim, category âBâ restitution, which shall 7 include court costs, and prosecution costs under section 8 815.13. 9